Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-207.02
Offstreet motor vehicle parking; acquisition; board of trustees; powers.

The powers granted by section 17-207.01 shall be exercised in the manner and be subject to all the terms, conditions, and limitations provided in sections 17-163 to 17-173.

Laws 1961, c. 50, § 2, p. 192.